Utah statutes.
17D-1-601.   Adoption of a resolution to approve withdrawal, dissolution, or
discontinuance of a service.
Subject to and as provided in this part, the legislative body of the county or
municipality that created a special service district may by resolution:
(1)  approve the withdrawal of an area from the special service district if
the legislative body determines that the area should not or cannot be provided
the service that the special service district provides;
(2)  approve the dissolution of the special service district if the
legislative body determines that the special service district is no longer
needed for the purposes for which it was created; or
(3)  discontinue a service that the special service district provides.
